Washington statutes.
RCW 16.72.020

Quarantine controls.

Fur farming shall be deemed an agricultural pursuit and the director is hereby authorized to exercise quarantine controls over such farms in accordance with the provisions of this title. Facilities available to the department may be used by the director in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1955 c 321 s 3.]